Rhode Island statutes. Title 8 Courts and Civil Procedure — Courts
Chapter 5 Court Secretaries, Court Reporters, and Electronic Court Reporters

8-5-1.
Supreme court secretary and assistant.

The supreme court may appoint a secretary and an assistant secretary, each of whom shall hold office during its pleasure and shall perform such duties as may be required by the court.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 69; G.L. 1909, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 1920, ch. 1894, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 328, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 503, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

8-5-1

; P.L. 2015, ch. 260, § 6; P.L. 2015, ch. 275, § 6.

8-5-2.
Superior court secretary and assistants.

The justices of the superior court, or a majority of them, may appoint a secretary of the court and five (5) assistant secretaries, who shall hold office during the pleasure of the court and shall perform such duties as may be required by the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1910, ch. 556, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 328, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 503, § 2; P.L. 1952, ch. 3030, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

8-5-2

; P.L. 1974, ch. 175, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 217, § 1.

8-5-3.
Appointment of superior court reporters and electronic court reporters.

The justices of the superior court, or a majority of them, shall appoint competent shorthand writers or stenotypists, known as court reporters, for regular service in the superior court, and one or more such persons for occasional service therein in the absence of other appointees, who shall be known as court reporters. They shall serve during the pleasure of the court and where designated by the presiding justice; provided, that when any justice of the court has retired from active service, and with his or her own consent on request of the presiding justice of the court is assigned to perform service as an associate justice of the court, one of the court reporters or electronic court reporters defined in subsection (b), appointed for occasional service shall, during the time any such justice is so assigned and performing service, be appointed for regular service in the court, and when performing such regular service, shall receive the same compensation authorized to be paid to court reporters or electronic court reporters appointed for regular service.

The presiding justice shall have sole discretion to employ and assign persons to record court proceedings by electronic means as in his or her judgment may be necessary for the conduct of the business of the superior court. Such persons employed and assigned by the presiding justice shall be known as electronic court reporters.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 70; P.L. 1907, ch. 1420, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 278, § 2; P.L. 1913, ch. 907, § 1; P.L. 1922, ch. 2162, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 328, § 3; P.L. 1929, ch. 1401, § 1; P.L. 1930, ch. 1541, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 503, § 3; P.L. 1946, ch. 1668, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

8-5-3

; P.L. 1990, ch. 206, § 2.

8-5-4.
Court reporters and electronic court reporters — Supplies and preservation of notes and other materials.

All books, papers, recording media, and supplies necessary for use by court reporters and electronic court reporters shall be furnished by the state, and the notebooks used and notes and recordings taken by them shall be the property of the state and be deposited with the clerk of the court in Providence county; provided, the clerk shall not be required to preserve the notebooks and notes and recordings beyond the period of fifteen (15) years.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 70; P.L. 1907, ch. 1420, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 278, § 2; P.L. 1913, ch. 907, § 1; P.L. 1922, ch. 2162, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 328, § 3; P.L. 1929, ch. 1401, § 1; P.L. 1930, ch. 1541, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 503, § 3; P.L. 1946, ch. 1668, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

8-5-4

; P.L. 1981, ch. 110, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 206, § 2.

8-5-4.1.
Freelance court reporters and electronic court reporters.

All stenographic notes of freelance court reporters or recordings and notes of freelance electronic court reporters pertaining to all proceedings which have been completely transcribed may be destroyed after seven (7) years, unless otherwise ordered by any court.

Stenographic notes of freelance court reporters and recordings and notes of freelance electronic court reporters, pertaining to all proceedings which have not been transcribed or which have been partially transcribed, may be destroyed after ten (10) years unless otherwise ordered by any court.

Provided, however, depositions taken under the federal rules of civil procedure shall not be destroyed at any time.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 178, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 206, § 2.

8-5-5.
Reports of superior, family and district court and traffic tribunal.

Court reporters shall report stenographically or electronic court reporters or similar recording personnel shall report electronically the proceedings in the trial of every action or proceeding, civil or criminal, in the superior court, family court, district court and traffic tribunal. Each court reporter or electronic court reporter or similar recording personnel shall also, upon the order of any justice of the court, transcribe or otherwise reproduce his or her report to be filed with the papers in the case. He or she shall also make a transcript of or otherwise reproduce the whole or any part of the report upon the written request, filed with the clerk, by either party to the action or proceeding, and when completed and within the time limited by the court for filing the transcript, shall immediately deliver the transcript to the party ordering it, or to the attorney of record of the party, and in the case of transcription by court reporters for such service shall be paid a reasonable compensation, not less than five dollars ($5.00) and not exceeding three dollars ($3.00) per page for originals and one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) per page for copies thereof, to be allowed by the court; and, in case the transcript is used in subsequent proceedings in the cause, the cost of the transcript may be allowed as a part of the costs. In the case of electronic court recordings the person making the recordings or another person so designated by the court may be requested or ordered, in lieu of making a transcript, to reproduce the recording and certify its authenticity, and in such case each party requesting the reproduction shall pay to the court the sum of ten dollars ($10.00) per cassette.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 71; G.L. 1909, ch. 278, § 3; P.L. 1909, ch. 421, § 1; P.L. 1916, ch. 1402, § 1; P.L. 1920, ch. 1895, § 1; P.L. 1921, ch. 2041, § 1; P.L. 1921, ch. 2086, § 5; P.L. 1922, ch. 2164, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 328, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 503, § 4; P.L. 1956, ch. 3763, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

8-5-5

; P.L. 1966, ch. 1, § 3; P.L. 1972, ch. 29, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 320, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 174, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 206, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 95, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 5, § 4; P.L. 1999, ch. 473, § 2.

8-5-6.
Appointing court reporter and electronic court reporter for grand jury proceedings.

Whenever the attorney-general shall make request in writing to the presiding justice of the superior court, he or she shall designate a court reporter or electronic court reporter or similar recording personnel to attend such sittings of any grand jury as the attorney-general may designate and to report stenographically in the case of the court reporter or electronically in the case of an electronic court reporter or similar recording personnel the testimony given before the grand jury, and it shall be lawful for the court reporter or electronic court reporter or similar recording personnel to attend such sittings for such purpose; provided, that the court reporter or electronic court reporter or similar recording personnel shall not be present during the deliberations of the grand jury or other proceedings, except during the taking of testimony. The court reporter or electronic court reporter or similar recording personnel shall, in all cases, before entering upon such duties, be first sworn by the clerk of the court to secrecy. He or she shall transcribe such testimony as the attorney-general may direct, and all such transcripts or recordings shall be delivered forthwith to the attorney-general.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 70; P.L. 1907, ch. 1420, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 278, § 2; P.L. 1913, ch. 907, § 1; P.L. 1922, ch. 2162, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 328, § 3; P.L. 1929, ch. 1401, § 1; P.L. 1930, ch. 1541, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 503, § 3; P.L. 1946, ch. 1668, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

8-5-6

; P.L. 1972, ch. 169, § 2; P.L. 1990, ch. 206, § 2.

8-5-7.
Appropriations for court reporters and electronic court reporters.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate such sum as it may deem necessary to compensate the stenographers, court reporters, and electronic court reporters and similar recording personnel for their services; and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her order upon the general treasurer for the payment of that sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary for that purpose, upon vouchers approved by the clerk of the superior court for the counties of Providence and Bristol.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 71; G.L. 1909, ch. 278, § 3; P.L. 1909, ch. 421, § 1; P.L. 1916, ch. 1402, § 1; P.L. 1920, ch. 1895, § 1; P.L. 1921, ch. 2041, § 1; P.L. 1921, ch. 2086, § 5; P.L. 1922, ch. 2164, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 328, § 4; P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 149; G.L. 1938, ch. 503, § 4; P.L. 1956, ch. 3763, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

8-5-7

; P.L. 1990, ch. 206, § 2.

8-5-8.
Sign language interpreters/transliterators and Communication Access Realtime Translation (CART) providers for deaf, hard of hearing, and deaf-blind persons.

In all civil and criminal cases, in workers’ compensation, district, family, and superior court proceedings, mental health court competency hearings, state traffic tribunals, and in any case in any municipal court, including, but not limited to, on-site, court-provided, alternative dispute resolution, mediation, arbitration, diversion/intervention program or treatment; and in an administrative, commission, or agency hearing; pursuant to chapter 18 of this title, where a party or a witness is a person who is deaf, hard of hearing, or deaf-blind, or a juvenile whose parent or parents are deaf, hard of hearing, or deaf-blind is brought before a court for any reason, he or she shall have the proceedings accessible to him or her in a language that he or she can understand by a sign language interpreter/transliterator or CART provider appointed by the court. In any case where a sign language interpreter/transliterator or CART provider is required to be appointed by the court under this section, the court shall not commence proceedings until the appointed sign language interpreter/transliterator or CART provider is in court in a position not exceeding ten feet (10´) from, and in full view of the person who is deaf, hard of hearing, or deaf-blind. The sign language interpreter/transliterator or CART provider appointed under the terms of the section shall be required to take an oath that he or she will make a legally equivalent, linguistically true interpretation, transliteration, or transcription for the person who is deaf, hard of hearing, or deaf-blind of all the proceedings or hearings of the case or claim in a language that he or she understands; and will orally transfer the meaning of the answer to questions and any other statements of the person who is deaf, hard of hearing, or deaf-blind to counsel, the court, and jury in the English language with exactitude, while accurately reflecting the form and content of the linguistic and paralinguistic elements of the speaker’s discourse.

Assistive listening devices, or other reasonable and effective auxiliary aids available, shall be provided for the deaf, hard of hearing, and deaf-blind who need to maximize their engagement in the proceedings or hearings in addition to the interpreter/transliterator and/or CART providers.

For the purposes of this section, “sign language interpreter/transliterator” means a person who is a certified interpreter as defined in §

5-71-3

in providing the interpreting and transliterating services for the deaf, hard of hearing, and deaf-blind. “CART provider” means a person who is a qualified communication access realtime translation (CART) service provider certified by the National Court Reporters Association. “Paralinguistic elements” means a non-verbal element of language, including all of the pauses, hedges, self-corrections, hesitations, and emotion as they are conveyed through tone of voice, word choice, level of formality, tone of voice, and intonation. “Assistive listening device (ALD) or assistive listening system (ALS)” means instruments that are designed to improve a person’s ability to hear in specific listening situations. Some ALDs amplify a sound signal, but the primary purpose of an ALD is to make the targeted sound easier to hear by isolating the sound source from surrounding noise. Examples are induction loop systems, frequency-modulated (FM) systems, infrared systems, and personal amplifiers. A sign language interpreter/transliterator, or CART provider shall be deemed qualified in accordance with United States Department of Justice regulations effectuating Title II of the federal “Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990,” as from time to time may be amended, Pub. L. 101-336, codified at 42 U.S.C. § 12101 et seq., including regulations, analysis, and technical assistance and as determined by the definition of chapter 71 of title 5 and the commission on the deaf and hard of hearing, based upon recommendations from the National Association of the Deaf, the National Registry of Interpreters for the Deaf, the National Hearing Loss Association of America, and other appropriate agencies. The commission on the deaf and hard of hearing shall coordinate all requests for qualified sign language interpreters/transliterators and CART providers and shall maintain a list of all such sign language interpreters/transliterators and CART providers from which it shall fill such requests. No sign language interpreter/transliterator or CART provider is precluded from being further examined by the court system.

Sign language interpreters/transliterators and CART providers appointed under the terms of the section shall be paid by the state or municipality a reasonable compensation fixed by the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 269, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 96, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 235, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 150, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 5; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 5; P.L. 1999, ch. 218, art. 5, § 16; P.L. 2013, ch. 179, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 218, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 47.

8-5-8.1.
Waiver of interpreter/transliterator and CART provider.

A non-English speaking person may at any point in the proceeding waive the right to the services of an interpreter/transliterator or a CART provider, but only when: (1) The waiver is approved by the appointing authority after explaining on the record to the non-English speaking person through an interpreter/transliterator or a CART provider the nature and effect of the waiver; (2) The appointing authority determines on the record that the waiver has been made knowingly, intelligently, and voluntarily; and (3) The non-English speaking person has been afforded the opportunity to consult with his or her attorney.

At any point in any proceeding or hearing, for good cause shown, a non-English speaking person may retract his or her waiver and request an interpreter/transliterator or a CART provider.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 179, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 218, § 2.

8-5-8.2.
Privileged communications.

In the trial of every cause, both civil and criminal, no interpreter/transliterator for the deaf, hard of hearing, and deaf-blind shall be competent to testify concerning any statement made to him or her in connection with the interpreter’s or transliterator’s interpretation or transliteration for the deaf, hard of hearing, and deaf-blind, without the consent of the person making the statement. No duly licensed interpreter/transliterator for the deaf, hard of hearing, and deaf-blind shall be allowed, in giving testimony to disclose any confidential communication, properly entrusted to him or her in his or her professional capacity, and necessary and proper to enable him or her to discharge the functions of his or her office in the usual course of practice or discipline, without the consent of the person making the communication.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 179, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 218, § 2.

8-5-8.3.
Visual recording of testimony.

At the request of any party to the proceeding or the hearing or on the appointing authority’s initiative, the appointing authority may order that the testimony of the person who is deaf, hard of hearing, and deaf-blind and the interpretation/transliteration of the proceeding by the qualified interpreter/transliterator be visually recorded for use in verification of the official transcript of the proceeding or hearing.

In any judicial proceeding involving a capital offense, the appointing authority may order that the testimony of the person who is deaf, hard of hearing, and deaf-blind and the interpretation/transliteration of the proceeding or the hearing by the qualified interpreter/transliterator be visually recorded for use in verification of the official transcript of the proceeding or the hearing.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 179, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 218, § 2.

8-5-9.
Right to stenographic record.

Where not already provided by law, any party to any legal action shall have the right to have a stenographer present provided that the party bears the expense of the stenographer, his or her transcription, and any other expenses incidental thereto. For purposes of this section the term “legal action” shall include all formal proceedings before any court or quasijudicial authority, all administrative hearings described in §

42-35-9

, all zoning hearings, all district court trials, and all workers’ compensation formal proceedings.

It shall be the duty of the party desiring the services of a stenographer to secure the presence of the stenographer, and there shall be no right to a continuance because of the unavailability of a stenographer.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed to permit stenographers to attend grand jury proceedings as a matter of right.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 382, § 1.